[7001]
Abdullah b. Umar reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) went along with him in the company of some persons and there was Umar b. Khattab also amongst them till they saw Ibn Sayyad as a young boy just on the threshold of adolescence playing with children near the battlement of Bani Mu'awiya; the rest of the hadith is the same but with these concluding words: "Had his mother left him (to murmur) his matter would have become clear."
[7002]
Ibn 'Umar reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) happened to pass by Ibn Sayyad along with his Companions including 'Umar b. Khattab as he was playing with children near the battlement of Bani Maghala and he was also a child by that time. The rest of the hadith is the same as narrated by Ibn Umar (in which there is a mention of) setting out of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) along with Ubayy b. Ka'b towards the date-palm trees.
[7003]
Nafi' reported that Ibn 'Umar met Ibn Si'id on some of the paths of Medina and he said to him a word which enraged him and he was so much swollen with anger that the way was blocked. Ibn 'Umar went to Hafsa and informed her about this. Thereupon she said: May Allah have mercy upon you, why did you incite Ibn Sayyad in spite of the fact that you knew it would be the extreme anger which would make Dajjal appear in the world?
[7004]
Nafi' reported that Ibn 'Umar said: I met lbn Sayyad twice and said to some of them (his friends): You state that it was he (the Dajjal). He said: By Allah, it is not so. I said: You have not told me the truth; by Allah some of you informed me that he would not die until he would have the largest number of offspring and huge wealth and it is he about whom it is thought so. Then Ibn Sayyad talked to us. I then departed and met him again for the second time and his eye had been swollen. I said: What has happened to your eye? He said: I do not know. I said: This is in your head and you do not know about it? He said: If Allah so wills He can create it (eye) in your staff. He then produced a sound like the braying of a donkey. Some of my companions thought that I had struck him with the staff as he was with me that the staff broke into pieces, but, by Allah, I was not conscious of it. He then came to the Mother of the Faithful (Hafsa) and narrated it to her and she said: What concern you have with him? Don't you know that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said that the first thing (by the incitement of which) he would come out before the public would be his anger?
[7005]
Ibn Umar reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). made a mention of Dajjil in the presence of the people and said: Allah is not one-eyed and behold that Dajjal is blind of the right eye and his eye would be like a floating grape.
[7006]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn 'Umar through another chain of transmitters.
[7007]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: There is never a prophet who has not warned the Ummah of that one-eyed liar; behold he is one-eyed and your Lord is not one-eyed. On his forehead are the letters k f.r. (Kafir).
[7008]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: There would be written three letters k.f.r., i.e. Kafir, between the eyes of the Dajjal.
[7009]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Dajjal is blind of one eye and there is written between his eyes the word "Kafir". He then spelled the word as k.f.r., which every Muslim would be able to read.
[7010]
Hudhalfa reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Dajjal is blind of left eye with thick hair and there would be a garden and fire with him and his fire would be a garden and his garden would be fire.
[7011]
Hudhaifa reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: the Dajjal would have with him water and fire and his fire would bays the effect of cold water and his water would have the effect of fire, so don't put yourself to ruin. Abu Mas'ud reported: I also heard it from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).
[7012]
'Uqba b. 'Amr Abu Mas'ud al-Ansari reported : I went to Hudhaifa b. Yaman and said to him: Narrate what you have heard from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) pertaining to the Dajjal. He said that the Dajjal would appear and there would be along with him water ant fire and what the people would see as water that would be fire and that would burn and what would appear as fire that would be water and any one of you who would see that should plunge in that which he sees as fire for it would be sweet, pure water, and 'Uqba said: I also heard it, testifying Hudhaifa.
[7013]
Hudhaifa and Ibn Mas'ud met together. Hudhaifa said: I know more than you as to what there would be along with the Dajjal. There would be along with him two canals (one flowing with water) and the other one (having) fire (within it), and what you would see as fire would be water and what you would see as water would be fire. So he who amongst you is able to see that and is desirous of water should drink out of that which he sees as fire.
[7014]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: May I not inform you about the Dajjal what no Apostle of Allah narrated to his people? He would be blind and he would bring along with him an Image of Paradise and Hell-Fire and what he would call as Paradise that would be Hell-Fire and I warn you as Noah warned his people.
[7015]
An-Nawwas b. Sam'an reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) made a mention of the Dajjal one day in the morning. He sometimes described him to be insignificant and sometimes described (his turmoil) as very significant rand we felt) as if he were in the cluster of the date-palm trees. When we went to him (to the Holy Prophet) in the evening and he read (the signs of fear) in our faces, he said: What is the matter with you? We said : Allah's Messenger, you made a mention of the Dajjal in the morning (sometimes describing him) to be insignificant and sometimes very important, until we began to think as if he were present in some (near) part of the cluster of the datpalm trees. Thereupon he said: I harbour fear in regard to you in so many other things besides the Dajjal. If he comes forth while I am among on, I shall contend with him on your behalf, but if he comes forth while I am not amongst you, a man must contend on his own behalf and Allah would take care of every Muslim on my behalf (and safeguard him against his evil). He (Dajjal) would be a young man with twisted, contracted hair, and a blind eye. I compare him to 'Abd-ul-'Uzza b. Qatan. He who amongst you would survive to see him should recite over him the opening verses of Sura Kahf (xviii.). He would appear on the way between Syria and Iraq and would spread mischief right and left. O servant of Allah ! adhere (to the path of Truth). We said: Allah's Messenger, how long would he stay on the earth? He said.. For forty days, one day like a year and one day like a month and one day like a week and the rest of the days would be like your days. We said: Allah's Messenger, would one day's prayer suffice for the prayers of day equal to one year? Thereupon he said: No, but you must make an estimate of time (and then observe prayer). We said: Allah's Messenger, how quickly would he walk upon the earth? Thereupon he said: Like cloud driven by the wind. He would come to the people and invite them (to a wrong religion) and they would affirm their faith in him and respond to him. He would then give command to the sky and there would be rainfall upon the earth and it would grow crops. Then in the evening, their posturing animals would come to them with their humps very high and their udders full of milk and their flanks stretched. He would then come to another people and invite them. But they would reject him and he would go away from them and there would be drought for them and nothing would be lef t with them in the form of wealth. He would then walk through the waste, land and say to it: Bring forth your treasures, and the treasures would come out and collect (themselves) before him like the swarm of bees. He would then call a person brimming with youth and strike him with the sword and cut him into two pieces and (make these pieces lie at a distance which is generally) between the archer and his target. He would then call (that young man) and he will come forward laughing with his face gleaming (with happiness) and it would at this very time that Allah would send Christ, son of Mary, and he will descend at the white minaret in the eastern side of Damscus wearing two garments lightly dyed with saffron and placing his hands on the wings of two Angels. When he would lower his head, there would fall beads of perspiration from his head, and when he would raise it up, beads like pearls would scatter from it. Every non-believer who would smell the odour of his self would die and his breath would reach as far as he would be able to see. He would then search for him (Dajjal) until he would catch hold of him at the gate of Ludd and would kill him. Then a people whom Allah had protected would come to Jesus, son of Mary, and he would wipe their faces and would inform them of their ranks in Paradise and it would be under such conditions that Allah would reveal to Jesus these words: I have brought forth from amongst My servants such people against whom none would be able to fight; you take these people safely to Tur, and then Allah would send Gog and Magog and they would swarm down from every slope. The first of them would pass the lake of Tibering and drink out of it. And when the last of them would pass, he would say: There was once water there. Jesus and his companions would then be besieged here (at Tur, and they would be so much hard pressed) that the head of the ox would be dearer to them than one hundred dinirs and Allah's Apostle, Jesus, and his companions would supplicate Allah, Who would send to them insects (which would attack their necks) and in the morning they would perish like one single person. Allah's Apostle, Jesus, and his companions would then come down to the earth and they would not find in the earth as much space as a single span which is not filled with their putrefaction and stench. Allah's Apostle, Jesus, and his companions would then again beseech Allah, Who would send birds whose necks would be like those of bactrin camels and they would carry them and throw them where God would will. Then Allah would send rain which no house of clay or (the tent of) camels' hairs would keep out and it would wash away the earth until it could appear to be a mirror. Then the earth would be told to bring forth its fruit and restore its blessing and, as a result thereof, there would grow (such a big) pomegranate that a group of persons would be able to eat that, and seek shelter under its skin and milch cow would give so much milk that a whole party would be able to drink it. And the milch camel would give such (a large quantity of) milk that the whole tribe would be able to drink out of that and the milch sheep would give so much milk that the whole family would be able to drink out of that and at that time Allah would send a pleasant wind which would soothe (people) even under their armpits, and would take the life of every Muslim and only the wicked would survive who would commit adultery like asses and the Last Hour would come to them.
[7016]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Jabir with the same chain of transmitters but with this addition that Gog and Magog would walk until they would reach the mountain of al-Khamar and it is a mountain of Bait-ul-Maqdis and they would say: We have killed those who are upon the earth. Let us now kill those who are In the sky and they would throw their arrows towards the sky and the arrows would return to them besmeared with blood. And in the narration of Ibn Hujr (the words are) : "I have sent such persons (Gog and Magog) that none would dare fight against them.
[7017]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) one day gave a detailed account of the Dajjal and in that it was also included: He would come but would not be allowed to ether the mountain passes to Medina. So he will alight at some of the barren tracts near Medina, and a person who would be the best of men or one from amongst the best of men would say to him: I bear testimony to the fact that you are Dajjal about whom Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had informed us. The Dajjal would say: What is your opinion if I kill this (person), then I bring him back to life; even then will you harbour doubt in this matter? They would say: No. He would then kill (the man) and then bring him back to life. When he would bring tha@ person to life, he would say: By Allah, I had no better proof of the fact (that you are a Dajjal) than at the present time (that you are actually so). The Dajjal would then make an attempt to kill him (again) but he would not be able to do that. Abu Ishaq reported that it was said: That person would be Khadir (Allah be pleased with him).
[7018]
This hadith has been narrated by Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters.
[7019]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The Dajjal would come forth and a person from amongst the believers would go towards him and the armed men of the Dajjal would meet him and they would say to him: Where do you intend to go? He would say: I intend to go to this one who is coming forth. They would say to him: Don't you believe in our Lord? He would say: There is nothing hidden about our Lord. They would say: Kill him. Then some amongst them would say: Has your master (Dajjal) not forbidden you to kill anyone without (his consent)? And so they would take him to the Dajjal and when the believer would see him, he would say: O people. he is the Dajjil about whom Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) has informed (us). The Dajjal would then order for breaking his head and utter (these words): Catch hold of him and break his head. He would be struck even on his back and on his stomach. Then the Dajjal would ask him: Don't you believe in me? He would say: You are a false Masih. He would then order him to be torn (into pieces) with a saw from the parting of his hair up to his legs. After that the Dajjal would walk between the two pieces. He would then say to him: Stand, and he would stand erect. He would then say to him: Don't you believe in me? And the person would say: It has only added to my insight concerning you (that you are really the Dajjal). He would then say: O people, he would not behave with anyone amongst people (in such a manner) after me. The Dajjal would try to catch hold of him so that he should kill him (again). The space between his neck and collar bone would be turned into copper and he would find no means to kill him. So he would catch hold of him by his hand and feet and throw him (into the air) and the people would think as if he had been thrown in the Hell-Fire whereas he would be thrown in Paradise. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: He would be the most eminent amongst persons in regard to martyrdom in the eye of the Lord of the world.
[7020]
Mughira b. Shu'ba reported: No one asked Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) more about Dajjil than I asked him. He said: He should not be a source of worry to you for he would not be able to do any harm to you. I said: Allah's Messenger, it is alleged that he would have along with him (abundance of) food and water. Thereupon he said: He would be very insignificant in the eye of Allah (even) with all this.
[7021]
Mughira b. Shu'ba reported that none asked Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) about Dajjal more than I asked him. I (one of the narrators other than Mughlra b. Shu'ba) said: What'did you ask? Mughira replied: I said that the people alleged that he would have a mountain load of bread and mutton and rivers of water. Thereupon he said: He would be more insignificant in the eye of Allah compared with all this.
[7022]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Isma'il through other chains of transmitters with a slight variation of wording.
[7023]
'Abdullah b. 'Amr reported that a person came to him and said: What is this hadith that you narrate that the Last Hour would come at such and such time? Thereupon he said: Hallowed be Allah, there is no god but Allah (or the words to the same effect). I have decided that I would not narrate anything to anyone now.I had only said that you would see after some time an important event that the (sacred) House (Ka'ba) would be burnt and it would happen and definitely happen. He then reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: The Dajjal would appear in my Ummah and he would stay (in the world) for forty-I cannot say whether he meant forty days, forty months or forty years. And Allah would then send Jesus son of Mary who would resemble 'Urwa b Mas'ud. He (Jesus Christ) would chase him and kill him. Then people would live for seven years that there would be no ran. cour between two persons. Then Allah would send cold wind from the side of Syria that none would survive upon the earth having a speck of good in him or faith in him but he would die, so much so that even if some amongst you were to enter the innermost part of the mountain, this wind would reach that place also and that would cause his heath. I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Only the wicked people would survive and they would be as careless as birds with the charactertistics of beasts. They would never appreciate the good nor condemn evil. Then the Satan would come to them in human form and would say: Don't you respond? And they would say: What do you order us? And he would command them to worship the idols but, in spite of this, they would have abundance of sustenance and lead comfortable lives. Then the trumpet would be blown and no one would hear that but he would bend hfs neck to one side and raise it from the other side and the first one to hear that trumpet would be the person who would be busy in setting right the tank meant for providing water to the camels. He would swoon and the other people would also swoon, then Allah would send or He would cause to send rain which would be like dew and there would grow out of it the bodies of the people. Then the second trumpet would be blown and they would stand up and begin to look (around). Then it would be said: O people, go to your Lord, and make them stand there. And they would be questioned. Then it would be said: Bring out a group (out of them) for the Hell-Fire. And then it would be asked: How much? It would be said: Nine hundred and ninty-nine out of one thousand for the Hell-Fire and that would be the day which would make the children old because of its terror and that would be the day about which it has been said: "On the day when the shank would be uncovered" (lxviii. 42).
[7024]
Ya'qub b. 'Asim b. Urwa b. Mas'ud reported: I heard a person saying to 'Abdullah b. Amr: You say that the Last Hour would come at such and such time, whereupon he said: I had made up my mind that I would not narrate anything to you. I only said: But you would soon see after some time a very significant affair, for example the burning of the House (Ka'ba). Shu'ba said like this and 'Abdullah b Amr reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said: The Dajjal would appear in my Ummah. And in another hadith (the words are): None would survive who would have even a speck of faith in his heart, but he would be dead. Muhammad b. ja'far reported that Shu'ba narrated to him this hadith many a time and I also read it out to him many a time.
[7025]
Abdullah b. 'Amr reported: I committed to memory a hadith from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and I did not forget it after I had heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The first sign (nut of the signs of the appearance of the Dajjal) would be the appearance of the sun from the west, the appearance of the beast before the people in the forenoon and whkch of the two hap- pens first, the second one would follow immediately after that.
[7026]
Abu Zur'a reported that three persons amongst Muslims had been sitting in Medina in the presence of Marwan b. Hakam and they heard him narrate these signs from him and the first amongst them was the appearance of the Dajjal. 'Abdullah b. 'Amr reported that Marwin said nothing (particular in this connection). I, however, heard a hadith from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and I did not forget that after I had heard that from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and he reported a hadith like the foregoing.
[7027]
Abu Zur'a reported that there was a discussion in the presence of Marwan about the Last Hour, and Abdullah b. 'Amr said: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying. The rest of the hadith is the same, but there is no mention of forenoon.
[7028]
Amir b. Sharahil Sha'bi Sha'b Hamdan reported that he asked Fatima, daughter of Qais and sister of ad-Dahhak b. Qais and she was the first amongst the emigrant women: Narrate to me a hadith which you had heard directly from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and there is no extra link in between them. She said: Very well, if you like, I am prepared to do that, and he said to her: Well, do It and narrate that to me. She said: I married the son of Mughira and he was a chosen young man of Quraish at that time, but he fell as a martyr in the first Jihad (fighting) on the side of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). When I became a widow, 'Abd al-Rahman b. Auf, one amongst the group of the Companions of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), sent me the proposal of marriage. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) also sent me such a message for his freed slave Usama b. Zaid. And it had been conveyed to me that Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) had said (about Usama): He who loves me should also love Usima. When Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) talked to me (about this matter), I said: My affairs are in your hand. You may marry me to anyone whom you like. He said: You better shift now to the house of Umm Sharik, and Umm Sharik was a rich lady from amongst the Anqir. She spent generously for the cause of Allah and entertained guests very hospitably. I said: Well, I will do as you like. He said: Do not do that for Umm Sharik is a woman who is very frequently vizited by guests and I do not like that your head may be uncovered or the cloth may be removed from your shank and the strangers may catch sight of them which you abhor. You better shift to the house of your cousin 'Abdullah b. 'Amr b. Umm Maktum and he is a person of the Bani Fihr branch of the Quraish, and he belonged to that tribe (to which F5tiina) belonged. So I shifted to that house, and when my period of waiting was over, I heard the voice of an announcer making an announcement that the prayer would be observed in the mosque (where) congregational prayer (is observed). So I set out towards that mosque and observed prayer along with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and I was in the row of the women which was near the row of men. When Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had finished his prayer, he sat on the pulpit smiling and said: Every worshipper should keep sitting at his place. He then said: Do you know why I had asked you to assemble? They said: Allah and His Messenger know best. He said: By Allah. I have not made you assemble for exhortation or for a warning, but I have detained you here, for Tamim Dari, a Christian, who came and accepted Islam, told me something, which agrees with what I was-telling, yuu about the Dajjal. He narrated to me that he had sailed in a ship along with thirty men of Bani Lakhm and Bani Judham and had been tossed by waves in the ocean for a month. Then these (waves) took them (near) the land within the ocean (island) at the time of sunset. They sat in a small side-boat and entered that Island. There was a beast with long thick hair (and because of these) they could not distinguish his face from his back. They said: Woe to you, who can you be? Thereupon it said: I am al-Jassasa. They said: What is al-Jassasa? And it said: O people, go to this person in the monastery as he is very much eager to know about you. He (the narrator) said: When it named a person for us we were afraid of it lest it should be a Devil. Then we hurriedly went on till we came to that monastery and found a well-built person there with his hands tied to his neck and having iron shackles between his two legs up to the ankles. We said: Woe be upon thee, who are you? And he said: You would soon come to know about me. but tell me who are you. We said: We are people from Arabia and we embarked upon a boat but the sea-waves had been driving us for one month and they brought as near this island. We got Into the side-boats and entered this island and here a beast met us with profusely thick hair and because of the thickness of his hair his face could not be distinguished from his back. We said: Woe be to thee, who are you? It said: I am al- Jassasa. We said: What is al-Jassasa? And it said: You go to this very person in the monastery for he is eagerly waiting for you to know about you. So we came to you in hot haste fearing that that might be the Devil. He (that chained person) said: Tell me about the date-palm trees of Baisan. We &aid: About what aspect of theirs do you seek information ? He said: I ask you whether these trees bear fruit or not. We said: Yes Thereupon he said: I think these would not bear fruits. He said: Inform me about the lake of Tabariyya? We said: Which aspect of it do you want to know? He said: Is there water in it? They said: There is abundance of water in it. Thereupon he said: I think it would soon become dry. He again said: Inform me about the spring of Zughar. They said: Which aspect of it you want to know? He (the chained person) said: Is there water in it and does it irrigate (the land) ? We said to him: Yes, there is abundance of water in it and the inhabitants (of Medina) irrigate (land) with the help of it, He said: Inform me about the unlettered Prophet; what has he done? We said: He has come out from Mecca and has settled In Yathrib (Medina). He said: Do the Arabs fight against him? We said: Yes. He said: How did he deal with him? We informed him that he had overcome those in his neighbourhood and they had submitted themselves before him. Thereupon he said to us: Had it actually happened? We said: Yes. Thereupon he said: If it is so that is better for them that they should show obedience to him. I am going to tell you about. myself and I am Dajjal and would be soon permitted to get out and so I shall get out and travel in the land, and will not spare any town where I would not stay for forty nights except Mecca and Medina as these two (places) are prohibited (areas) for me and I would not make an attempt to enter any one of these two. An angel with a sword in his hand would confront me and would bar my way and there would be angels to guard every passage leading to it; then Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) striking the pulpit with the help of the end of his staff said : This implies Taiba meaning Medina. Have I not, told you an account (of the Dajjal) like this?'The people said: Yes, and this account narrated by Tamim Dari was liked by me for it corroborates the account which I gave to you in regard to him (Dajjal) at Medina and Mecca. Behold he (Dajjal) is in the Syrian sea (Mediterranian) or the Yemen sea (Arabian sea). Nay, on the contrary, he As In the east, he is in the east, he is in the east, and he pointed with his hand towards the east. I (Fatima bint Qais) said: I preserved It In my mind (this narration from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).
[7029]
Al-Sha'bi reported: We visited Fatima b. Qais and she served us fresh dates which are called rutab and she also served us barley. I asked her about that woman in whose case three divorces had been pronounced as to how much time she should count as the waiting period. She said: My husband pronounced three divorces in my case and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) permitted me to spend any waiting period in my family. (It was during this period) that announcement was made for the people to observe prayer in the bigger Mosque. I went there along with people and I was in the front row meant for women and it was adjacent to the last row of men and I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) deliver sermon sitting on the pulpit. He said: The cousin of Tamim (Dari) sailed in the ocean. The rest of the hadith is the same but with this addition: "(I see) as if I am looking to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) pointing his rod towards the land (and saying): It is Taiba, i.e. Medina."
[7030]
Tamim Dari came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and informed Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) that he sailed in an ocean and his ship lost direction and thus landed at an island. They moved about in that land in search of water. There they saw a person who had been pulling his hair. The rest of the hadith is the same. And he (Dajjal) said: If I were to be permitted to set out I would have covered all the lands except Taiba. Then Allah's Messerger (may peace be upon him) brought (Tamim Dari) before the public and he narrated to them and said: That is Taiba and that is the Dajjal.
[7031]
Fatima b. Qais reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sat on the pulpit and said: O people, Tamim Dari has reported to me that some persons of his tribe sailed in the ocean in a boat and it capsised and then some of them travelled on one of the planks of the boat and they went to an island in the ocean. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[7032]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: There will be no land which would not be covered by the Dajjal but Mecca and Medina, and there would no passage out of the passages leading to them which would not be guarded by angels arranged in rows. Then he (the Dajjal) would appear in a barren place adjacent to Medina and it would rock three times that every unbeliever and hypocrite would get out of it towards him.
[7033]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Anas that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said this but with this addition that (the Dajjal would come) and pitch his tent in the waste-land of Juruf and thus there would come out of (the city) every hypocrite, man and woman.
[7034]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: The Dajjal would be followed by seventy thousand Jews of Isfahan wearing Persian shawls.
[7035]
Umm Sharik reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The people would run away from the Dajjal seeking shelter in the mountains. She said: Where would be the Arabs then in that day? He said: They would be small in number.
[7036]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn Juraij with the same chain of transmitters.
[7037]
Abu Qatada reported: We used to go to Imran b. Husain passing in front of Hisham b. 'Amir. He, one day, said: You pass by me (in order) to go to some per- sons but (amongst ttie living persons) none remained in the company of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) more than I and none knows more ahadith than I. I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There would be no creation (creating more trouble) than the Dajjal right from the creation of Adam to the Last Hour.
[7038]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of 'Imran b. Husain with a slight variation of wording.
[7039]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said: Hasten to do good deeds before six things happen: the rising of the sun from the west, the smoke, the Dajjal, the beast and (the death) of one of you or the general turmoil.
[7040]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Hasten in performing these good deeds (before these) six things (happen): (the appearance) of tribe Dijjal, the smoke, the beast of the earth, the rising of the sun from the west, the general turmoil (leadina to large-scale massacre) and death of masses and individuals.
[7041]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Qatada through another chain of transmitters.
[7042]
Ma'qil b. Yasar reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Worshiping during the period of widespread turmoil is like emigration towards me.
[7043]
Abdullah reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: The Last Hour would affect (most terribly) the wicked persons.
[7044]
This hadith has been reported by Sahl b. Sa'd that he heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: I and the Last Hour are (close to each other) like this (and he, in order to explain it) pointed (by joining his) forefinger, (one) next to the thumb and the middle finger (together).
[7045]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) said: I and the Last Hour have been sent like this. Shu'ba said: I heard Qatada as saying in his narration: The excellence of one over the other. And I do not know whether he narrated it from Anas or Qatada himself said so.
[7046]
Shu'ba reported: I heard Qatada and Abu Tayyab narrating that both of them heard Anas as narrating that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: I and the Last Hour have been sent like this, and Shu'ba drew his forefinger and middle finger near each other while narrating it.
[7047]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Anas through another chain of transmitters.
[7048]
Anas reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying like this, but he narrated it through another chain of transmitters.
[7049]
Anas reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: I and the Last Hour have been sent like this and (he while doing it) joined the forefinger with the middle finger.
[7050]
'A'isha reported that when the desert Arabs came to Allable Messenger (may peace be upon him) they asked about the Last Hour as to when that would come. And he looked towards the youngest amongst them and said: If he lives he would not grow very old that he would find your Last Hour coming to you the would see you dying).
[7051]
Anas reported that a person asked Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as to when the Last Hour would come. He had in his presence a young boy of the Ansar who was called Mabammad. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon bion) said: If this young boy lives. he may not grow very old till (he would see) the Last Hour coming to you.
[7052]
Anas b. Malik reported that a person asked Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him): When would the Last Hour come? Thereupon Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) kept quiet for a while. then looked at a young boy in his presence belonging to the tribe of Azd Shanilwa and he said: If this boy lives he would not grow very old till the Last Hour would come to you. Anas said that this young boy was of our age daring those days.
[7053]
Anas reported: A young boy of Mughira b. Shu'ba happened to pass by (the Holy Prophet) and he was of my age Thereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be apon him) said: If he lives long he would not grow very old till the Last Hour would come (to the old People of this generation).
[7054]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The Last Hour would come (so sudden) that a person would be milking the she- camel and the (milk) would not reach the brim of the vessel that the Last Hour would come, and the two persons would be engaged in buying and selling of the clothes and their bargain would not be struck before the Last Hour would come. And someone would be setting his tank in order and he would have hardly set it right when the Last Hour would come.
[7055]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Between the two blowiings of the trumpet (there would be an interval of forty). They said: Abu Huraira, do you mean forty days? He said: I cannot say anything. They said: Do you mean fortv months? He said: I cannot say anything They said: Do you mean forty years? He said: I cannot say anything. Then Allah would cause the water to, descend from the sky and they (people) will sprout like vegetable The only thing in a man which would not decay would be one bone (spinal chord) from which the whole frame would be reconstituted on the Day of Resurrection.
[7056]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as say- ing: The earth would consume every son of Adam except his spinal chord from which his body would be reconstituted (on the Day of Resurrection).
[7057]
Abu Huraira reported so many ahadith from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and amongst these one was this that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: There is a bone in the human being which the earth would never consume and it is from this that new bodies would be reconstituted (on the Day of Resurrection). They said: Allah's Messenger, which bone is that? Thereupon he said: It is the spinal bone.
[7058]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The world is a prison-house for a believer and Paradise for a non-believer.
[7059]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported that Allah's Apostle (may p(-ace be upon him) happened to walk through the bazar coming from the side of 'Aliya and the people were on both his sides.There he found a dead lamb with very short ears. He took hold of his ear and said: Who amongst you would like to have this for a dirham? They said: We do not like to have it even for less than that as it is of no use to us. He said: Do you wish to have it (free of any cost)?They said: By Allah, even if it were alive (we would not have liked to possess that), for there is detect in it as its ear is very short; now it is dead also.Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: By Allah, this world is more insignificant in the eye of Allah as it (this dead lamb) is in your eye.
[7060]
Jabir reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) narrating a hadith like this with a slight variation of wording.
[7061]
Mutarrif reported on the authority of his father: I came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as he was reciting: "Abundance diverts you" (cii. 1).He said: The son of Adam claims: My wealth, my wealth.And he (the Holy Prophet) said: O son of Adam. is there anything as your belonging except that which you consumed, which you utilised, or which you wore and then it was worn out or you gave as charity and sent it forward?
[7062]
Mutarrif reported on the authority of his father: I went to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him).The rest of the hadith is the same.
[7063]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: A servant says, My wealth. my wealth, but out of his wealth three things are only his: whatever he eats and makes use of or by means of which he dresses himself and it wears out or he gives as charity, and this is what he stored for himself (as a reward for the Hereafter), and what is beyond this (it is of no use to you) because you are to depart and leave it for other people.This hadith has been narrated on the authority of al-'Ala' b. 'Abd al-Rahman with the same chain of transmitters.
[7064]
Anas b. Malik reported Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) as saying: Three things follow the bier of a dead man. two of them come back and one is left with him: the members of his family. wealth and his-good deeds. The members of his family and wealth come back and the deeds alone are left with him.
[7065]
'Amr b. 'Auf, who was an ally of Banu 'Amir b. Luwayy (and he was one amongst them) who participated in Badr along with Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him). reported that , Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sent Abu Ubaida b. Jarrah to Bahrain for collecting Jizya and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had made a truce with the people of Bahrain and had appointed 'Ala' b. Hadrami and Abu Ubaida (for this purpose). They came with wealth from Bahrain and the Ansar beard about the arrival of Abu Ubaida and they had observed the dawn prayer along with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), and when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had finished the prayer they (the Ansar) came before him and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) smiled as he saw them and then said: I think you have heard about the arrival of Abu Ubaida with goods from Bahrain. They said: Allah's Messenger. yes, it is so.Thereupon he said: Be happy and be hopeful of that what gives you delight.By Allah, it is not the poverty about which I fear in regard to you but I am afraid in your case that (the worldly) riches way be given to you as were given to those who had gone before you and you begin to vie with one another for them as they vied for them. and these may destroy you as these destroyed them.
[7066]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Zuhri as reported by Yunus with a slight variation of wording.
[7067]
'Abdullah b. 'Amr b. al-As reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: How would you be, 0 people. when Persia and Rome would be conquered for you?'Abd at-Rahman b Auf said: We would say as Allah has commanded us and we would express our gratitude to Allah Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Nothing else besides it?You would (in fact) vie with one another, then you would feel jealous. then your relations would be estranged and then you will bear enmity against one another. or something to the same effect.Then you would go to the poor emigrants and would make some the masters of the others.
[7068]
Abu Huraira reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: When one of you looks at one who stands at a higher level than you in regard to wealth and physical structure he should also see one who stands at a lower level than you in regard to these things (in which he stands) at a hi-her level (as compared to him).
[7069]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira through another chain of transmitters.
[7070]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Look at those who stand at a lower level than you but don't look at those who stand at a higher level than you, for this would make the favours (conferred upon you by Allah) insignificant(in your eyes). Abu Mu'awiya said: Upon you.
[7071]
Abu Huraira ,narrated that he beard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There were three persons in Bani Isra'il, one suffering from leprosy, the other bald-headed and the third one blind. Allah decided to test them. So He sent an angel who came to one who was suffering from leprosy and said: Which thing do you like most? He said: Beautiful colour and fine skin and removal of that which makes me detestable in the eye of people. He wiped him and his illness was no more and he was conferred upon beautiful colour and beautiful skin.He (the angel) again said: Which property do you like most?He said: Camels, or he said: The cow the narrator is, however, doubtful about it, but (out of the persons) suffering from leprosy or baldness one of them definitely said: The came].And the other one said: Cow.And he (one who demanded came]) was bestowed upon a she-camel, in an advanced stage of pregnancy, and while giving he said: May Allah bless you in this I Then he came to the bald-headed person and said: Which thing do you like most?He said: Beautiful hair and that (this baldness) may be removed from me because of which people hate me He wiped his body and his illness was removed and he was bestowed upon beautiful hair, and the angel said: Which wealth do you like most? He said: The cow. And he was given a pregnant cow and while handing it over to him he (the angel) said: May Allah bless you in this I Then he came to the blind man and he said: Which thing do you like most?He said: Allah should restore my eyesight so that I should be able to see people with the help of that.He wiped his body and Allah restored to him his eyesight, and he (the angel) also said: Which wealth do you like most? He said.The flock of sheep.And he was given a pregnant goat and that gave birth to young ones and it so happened that one valley abounded in camels and the other one in goats and the third one in sheep.He then came to one suffering from leprosy in his (old) form and shape and he said: I am a poor person and my provision has run short in my journey and there is none to take me to my destination except with the help of Allah and your favour.I beg of you in His name Who gave you fine colour and fine skin, and the camel in the shape of wealth (to confer upon me) a camel which should carry me in my journey.He said: I have many responsibilities to discharge. Thereupon he said: I perceive as if I recognise you.Were you not suffering from leprosy whom people hated and you were a destitude and Allah conferred upon you (wealth) He said: I have inherited this property from my forefathers.Thereupon he said: If you are a liar may Allah change you to that very position in which you had been.He then came to the one who was bald-headed in his (old) form and said to him the same what he had said to him (one suffering from leprosy) and he gave him the same reply as he had given him and he said: If you 'are a liar, may Allah turn you to your previous position in which you had been.And then he came to the blind man in his (old) form and shape and he said: I am a destitute person and a wayfarer.My provision have ran short and today there is no way to reach the destination but with the help of Allah and then with your help and I beg of you in the (name) of One Who restored your eyesight and gave you the flock of sheep to give me a sheep by which I should be able to make my provisions for the journey.He said: I was blind and Allah restored to me my eyesight; you take whatever you like and leave whatever you like. By Allah.I shall not stand in your way today for what you take in the name of God. Thereupon, he said: You keep with you what you have (in your possession). The fact is that you three were put to test and Allah is well pleased with you and He is annoyed with your companions.
[7072]
It is reported on the authority of Amir b. Sa'd that Sa'd b. Abi Waqqas was in the fold of his camels that his son 'Umar came to him.When Sa'd saw him he said: I seek refuge with Allah from the mischief of this rider. And as he got down he said to him: You are busy with your camels and your sheep and you have abandoned people who are contending with one another for kingdom.Sa'd struck his chest and said: Keep quite. I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Allah loves the servant who is God-conscious and is free from want and is hidden (from the view of people).
[7073]
Sa'd b. Abu Waqqas is reported to have, said : By Allah, I am the first person amongst the Arabs to throw an arrow in the cause of Allah and we used to go with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and there was no food for us to eat but only the leaves of hubla and samur trees (they are wild trees) and as a result thereof one amongst us would relieve himself as does the goat. (How strange it is) that now the people of Banu Asad (the progeny of Zubair) instruct me in religion and try to impose punishment upon me (in regard to it).If it is so (that I am so ignorant of religion), then indeed, I am undone and my deeds have been lost. Ibn Numair, however, did not make a mention of the word (idhan) thus? (in his narration).
[7074]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Isma'il b. Khalid with the same chain of transmitters and the words are: "One amongst us would relieve himself as the goats do without anything mixing with its excrement."
[7075]
'Umair al-'Adawi reported: 'Utba b. Ghazwan delivered us a sermon and he praised Allah and lauded Him, then said : Now coming to the point, verily the world has been given the news of its end and that too quite early. Nothing would be left out of it but only water left in the utensil which its owner leaves, and you are going to shift to an abode which knows no end, and you should shift with the good before you, for we have been told that a stone would be thrown at one side of the Hell and it would go down even for seventy years but would not be able to reach its bottom.By Allah, it would be fully packed.Do you find it something strange, and it has been mentioned that there yawns a distance which one would be able to cover in forty years from one end to another of Paradise, and a day would come when it would be fully packed and you must be knowing that I was the seventh amongst seven who had been with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and we had nothing to eat but the leaves of the tree until the corners of the mouth were injured. We found a sheet which we tore in two and divided between myself and Sa'd b. Malik. I made the lower garment with halt of it and so did Sa'd make the lower garment with half of it and today there is none amongst us who has not become the governor of a city from amongst the cities (of the Islamic Commonwealth) and I seek refuge with Allah that I should consider myself great whereas I am insignificant in the eye of Allah.Prophethood does not remain for ever and its impact fades with the result that it changes eventually into kingship, and you would soon come to know and experience those rulers who would come after us and see (how far they are from religion).
[7076]
Khalid b. 'Umair reported and he had seen the pre-Islamic days also, that 'Uqba b. Ghazwan delivered this address and he was the governor of Basra.The rest of the hadith is the same as transmitted by Shaiban.
[7077]
Khalid b. Umair reported: I heard Uqba b. Ghazwan as saving: I found myself as the seventh amongst the seven who had been along with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).We had nothing to eat but the leaves of hubla (a wild tree) until the corners of our mouths were injured.
[7078]
Abu Huraira reported that they (the Companions of the Holy Prophet) said: Allah's Messenger, will we be able to see our Lord on the Day of Judgment? He said: Do you feel any difficulty in seeing the sun in the noon when there is no cloud over it? They said: No. He again said: Do you feel any difficulty in seeing the moon on the fourteenth night when there is no cloud over it?They said: No. Thereupon he said: By Allah Who is One in Whose Hand is my life. you will not face any difficulty in seeing your Lord but only so much as you feel in seeing one of them. Then Allah would sit in judgment upon the servant and would say: O, so and so, did I not honour you and make you the chief and provide you the spouse and subdue for you horses, camels, and afforded you an opportunity to rule over your subjects? He would say: Yes.And then it would be said: Did you not think that you would meet Us? And he would say: No. Thereupon He (Allah) would say: Well, We forget you as you forgot Us.Then the second person would be brought for judgment. (And Allah would) say: 0, so and so. did We not honour you and make you the chief and make you pair and subdue for you horses and camels and afford you an opportunity to rule over your subjects?He would say: Yes, my Lord.And He (the Lord) would say: Did you not think that you would be meeting Us?And he would say: No. And then He (Allah) would say: Well, I forget you today as you forgot Us.Then the third -one would be brought and He (Allah) would say to him as He said before.And he (the third person) would say: O, my Lord, I affirmed my faith in Thee and in Thy Book and in Thy Messenger and I observed prayer and fasts and gave charity, and he would speak in good terms like this as he would be able to do.And He (Allah) would say: Well, We will bring our witnesses to you.And the man would think in his mind who would bear witness upon him and then his mouth would be sealed and it would be said to his thighs, to his flesh and to his bones to speak and his thighs. flesh and bones would bear witness to his deeds and it would be done so that he should not be able to make any excuse for himself and he would be a hypocrite and Allah would be annoyed with him.
[7079]
Anas b. Malik reported: We were in the company of Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) that he smiled and said: Do you know why I laughed?We said: Allah and His Messenger, know best.Thereupon he said: It was because of the (fact that there came to my mind the) talk which the servant would have with his Lord. (on the Day of judgment).He would say: My Lord, have you not guaranteed me protection against injustice? He would say : Yes.Then the servant would say: I do not deem valid any witness against me but my own self, and He would say: Well, enough would he the witness of your self against you and that of the two angels who had been appointed to record your deeds.Then the seal would be set upon his mouth and it would be said to his hands and feet to speak and they would speak of his deeds.Then the mouth would be made free to talk, he would say (to the bands and feet): Be away, let there be curse of Allah upon you.It was for your safety that I contended.
[7080]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: O Allah, make for the family of Muhammad the provision which is a bare subsistence.
[7081]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: 0 Allah, provide for the, family of Muhammad their subsistence, and in the narration transmitted on the authority of 'Amr (the words are): " O Allah, provide us subsistence "
[7082]
'Umara b. al-Qa'qa' reported this hadith with the same chain of transmitters but instead of the word "qut" (bare subsistence) there has been used the word "Kafaf" (adequate means to meet the needs).
[7083]
'A'isha reported: Never had the family of Muhammad (may peace be upon him) eaten to the fill since their, arrival in Medina with the bread of wheat for three successive nights until his (Holy Prophet's) death.
[7084]
'A'isha reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Never did Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) eat to his fill the bread of wheat for three successive days until he had run the course of his life.
[7085]
'A'isha reported: Never did the family of Muhammad (may peace be upon him) eat to the fill the bread of barley for two successive days until Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) died.
[7086]
'A'isha reported: Never could the family of Muhammad (may peace be upon him) (afford to cat to the fill) the bread of wheat beyond three days (successively).
[7087]
'A'isha reported: Never could the family of Muhammad (may peace. be upon him) (afford to eat) the bread of wheat for three (successive days) until he ran the course of his life.
[7088]
'A'isha reported: Never could the family of Muhammad (may peace be upon him) (afford to eat) the bread of wheat for two days successively.Even (out of these two days) one (was such wherein he could get) only a date.
[7089]
'A'isha reported: We the family of Muhammad (may peace be upon him) used to spend (the whole) month in which we (did not need to) kindle the fire as (we had nothing to cook); we had only dates and water (to fill our bellies).
[7090]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Urwa with the same chain of transmitters (and the words are): "We used to spend-" And he did not make a mention of the family of Muhammad (may peace be upon him), and Abu Kuraib made this addition to his hadith which was transmitted on the authority of Ibn Numair (and the words are): "But this that there was brought to us some meat."
[7091]
'A'isha reported that Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) died (in such a state) that there had been nothing in my wooden tub which a living being could afford to eat but a handful of barley therein. I had been eating out of that for a fairly long duration when I thought of measuring it and it was almost finished.
[7092]
'A'isha used to say to 'Urwa: Son of my sister, by Allah, I used to see the new moon, then the new moon, then the new moon, i.e. three moons in two months, and fire was not kindled in the house of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).I ('Urwa) said: Auntie, then what were your means of sustenance?She said: Dates and water.But it (so happened) that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had some Ansar as his neighbours and they had milch animals and they used to send to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) some milk of their (animals) and he served that to us.
[7093]
'Urwa b. Zubair reported on the authority of 'A'isha, the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), that she said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) died (in a state) that it never happened that he could eat to his fill the bread with olive oil twice during a day.
[7094]
'A'isha reported this hadith through other chains of transmitters also (and the words are) that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) died (in a state) when the people could afford to eat only the dates and water.
[7095]
'A'isha reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had died in a state that they could afford to cat two things only: water and dates.
[7096]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Sufyan and the words are: "We could not afford to eat to the fill even dates and water."
[7097]
Abu Huraira reported: By Him in Whose Hand is my life and Ibn 'Abbad also said: By One in Whose hand is the life of Abu Huraira, Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) could not afford to provide adequate food to his family which could (fill their bellies) with bread and wheat for three days successively until he left the world.
[7098]
Abu Hazim reported: I saw Abu Huraira point with his finger many a time and saying: By One in Whose Hand is the life of Abu Huraira, Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) could not eat to his fill and provide his family bread of wheat beyond three days successively until he left the world.
[7099]
Nu'man b. Bashir said: Don't you eat and drink according to your heart's desire, whereas I saw that your Prophet (may peace be upon him) (at times) could not find even an inferior quality of the dates with which he could fill his belly ? Qutaiba, however, did not make a mention of It.
[7100]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Simak with the same chain of transmitters, with this addition of words: "You are not satisfied with the qualities of dates and butter."
[7101]
Simak b. Barb reported: I heard Nu'man deliver an address in which he said that (Hadrat) Umar made a mention of what had fallen to the lot of people out of the material world and he said: I saw Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) spend the whole day being upset because of hunger and he could not get even an interior quality of dates with which he could fill his belly.
[7102]
'Abd al-Rahman al-Hubuli reported: I heard that a person asked 'Abdullah b. 'Amr b. 'Asas saying: Are we not amongst the destitute of the emigrants ? Abdullah said to him: Have you a spouse with whom you live?He said: Yes.He again said: Then you are amongst the rich.He said: I have a servant also. Thereupon he (Abdullah b. 'Amr b. 'As) said: Then you are amongst the kings.
Abu 'Abdal-Rahman reported that three persons came to 'Abdullah b. Amr b. 'As while I was sitting with him and they said: By Allah, we have nothing with us either in the form of provision, riding animals or wealth.Thereupon he said to them: I am prepared to do whatever you like.If you come to us, we would give you what Allah would make available for you. and if you like I would make a mention of your case to the ruler, and if you like you can show patience also. for I have beard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Destitute amongst the emigrants would precede the rich emigrants by forty years in getting into Paradise on the Day of Resurrection.Thereupon they said: We then, show patience and do not ask for anything.
[7103]
'Abdullah b. Umar reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said in connection with the people of Hijr (Thamud): Do not enter but weepingly (the habitations) of these people who bad been punished by (Allah), and in case you do not feel inclined to weep, then do not enter (these habitations) that you may not meet the same calamity as had fallen to their lot.
[7104]
Ibn Shihab reported, and he had been talking about the stony abodes of Thamud, and he said: Salim b. 'Abdullah reported that 'Abdullah b. Umar said : We were passing along with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) through the habitations of Hijr, and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Do not enter but weepingly the habitations of these persons who committed tyranny among themselves, lest the same calamity should fall upon you as it fell upon them.He then urged his mount to proceed quickly and pass through that valley hurriedly.
[7105]
Abdullah b. 'Umar reported that the people encamped along with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in the valley of Hijr, the habitations of Thamud, and they quenched their thirst from the wells thereof and kneaded the flour with it. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) commanded that the water collected for drinking should be spilt and the flour should be given to the camels and commanded them that the water for drinking should be taken from that well where the she-camel (of Hadrat Salih) used to come.
[7106]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Abdullah with the same chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording.
[7107]
Abu Huraira reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: One who makes efforts (for earning to be spent) on a widow and the destitute is like a striver in the cause of Allah, and I think he also said: He is like one who constantly stands for prayer and observes fast without breaking it.
[7108]
Abu Huraira reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: One who looks after the orphan whether he is his relative or not, I and he would be together in Paradise like this, and Malik (explained it) with the gesture by drawing his index finger and middle finger close together.
[7109]
Abdullah al-Khaulani reported that when Uthman b. 'Affan tried to rebuild the mosque of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) the people began to talk about this. Uthman b. 'Affan said: You discuss it very much whereas I have heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who builds a mosque-- and the narrator Bukair said: I think he also said: (for) seeking the pleasure of Allah- Allah would build (a similar house for him in Paradise). and in the narration of Harun (the words are): "A house for him in Paradise."
[7110]
Mahmud b. Labid reported that 'Uthman b. 'Affan decided to rebuild the mosque (of Allah's Apostle in Medina) but the people did not like this idea and they wished that it should be preserved in the same (old) form.Thereupon he (Hadrat 'Uthman) said: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who builds a mosque for Allah, Allah would build for him (a house) in Paradise like it.
[7111]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ja'far with the same chain of transmitters with this variation (that the words are): "Allah would build for him a house in Paradise."
[7112]
Abu Huraira reported: While a person was in the wilderness he heard a voice from the cloud (commanding it thus): Irrigate the garden of so and so. (After that the clouds slinked aside and poured water on a stony ground.It filled a channel amongst the channels of that land and that person followed that water and he found a person standing in the garden busy in changing the course of water with the help of a hatchet.He said to him: Servant of Allah, what is your name? he said: So and so. And it was that very name which he had heard from the clouds. and he said to him: Servant of Allah, why do you ask me my name?He said: I beard a voice from the clouds of which It is the downpour, saying: Water the garden of so and to. like your name. What do you do (for the favour) shown to you by Allah in this matter? He said: Now as you state so.I look what yield I get from it. and I give one-third as charity out of it and I and my children eat one-third of it and one-third I return to it as investment.
[7113]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Wahb b. Kaisan with the same chain of transmitters but with this change that he said: "I earmark one-third for the poor, the needy and the wayfarers."
[7114]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as stating that Allah the Most High and Exalted said: I am the One, One Who does not stand in need of a partner.If anyone does anything in which he associates anyone else with Me, I shall abandon him with one whom he associates with Allah.
[7115]
Ibn Abbas reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: If anyone wants to have his deeds widely publicised, Allah will publicise (his humiliation).And if anyone makes a hypocritical display (of his deeds) Allah will make a display of him.
[7116]
Jundub reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who wants to publicise (his deeds), Allah will publicise (his humility), and he who makes a hypocritical display (of his deeds), Allah will make a display of him.
[7117]
Sufyan reported this hadith with the same chain of transmitters and he made this addition: "I did not hear anyone saying besides him that it was Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) who had said so."
[7118]
Salama b. Kuhail reported: I heard from Jundub but I did not hear him say like this: "I beard Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) as saying this."
[7119]
Abu Sufyan reported like that as as-Saduq al-Amin al-Walid b. Harb narrated with the same chain of transmitters.
[7120]
Abu Huraira reported that he heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The servant speaks words for which he is sent down to the Hell-Fire farther than the distance between the cast and the west.
[7121]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The servant speaks words that he does not understand its repercussions but he sinks down in Hell-Fire farther than the distance between the east and the west.
[7122]
Shaqiq reported that it was said to Usama b. Zaid: Why don't you visit 'Uthman and talk to him? Thereupon he said: Do you think that I have not talked to him but that I have made you hear? By Allah. I have talked to him (about things) concerning me and him and I did not like to divulge those things about which I had to take the initiative and I do not say to my ruler: "You are the best among people," after I beard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: A man will be brought on the Day of Resurrection and thrown in Hell-Fire and his intestines will pour forth in Hell and he will go round along with them, as an ass goes round the mill. stone. The denizens of Hell would gather round him and say: 0, so and so, what has happened to you? Were you not enjoining us to do what was reputable and forbid us to do what was disreputable? He will say: Of course, it is so; I used to enjoin (upon people) to do what was reputable but did not practise that myself. I had been forbidding people to do what was disreputable, but practised it myself.
[7123]
Abu Wa'il reported: I was in the company of Usama b. Zaid that a person said: What prevents you to visit Uthman and talk to him for what he does? The rest of the hadith is the same.
[7124]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: All the people of my Ummah would get pardon for their sins except those who publicise them. And (it means) that a servant should do a deed during the night and tell the people in the morning that he has done so and so, whereas Allah has concealed it. And he does a deed during the day and when it is night he tells the people, whereas Allah has concealed it. Zuhair has used the word hijar for publicising.
[7125]
Anas b. Malik reported that two persons sneezed in the presence of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). He (the Messenger of Allah) invoked mercy for one, and did not invoke for the other. The one for whom he had not prayed said: So and so sneezed and you said: May Allah have mercy upon you. I also sneezed but you did not utter these words for me. Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: That person praised Allah, and you did not praise Allah.
[7126]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Anas through another chain of transmitters.
[7127]
Abu Burda reported: I visited Abu Musa, as he was in the house of the daughter of Fadl b. 'Abbas. I sneezed but he did not respond to it (by saying): Allah may have mercy upon you. Then she sneezed and he (Fadl b. 'Abbas) said: May Allah have mercy upon you. I came back to my mother and informed her about it, and when he came to her she said: My son sneezed in your presence and you did not say: "Allah may have mercy upon you, and she sneezed and you said for her: "May Allah have mercy upon you." Thereupon he said: Your son sneezed but he did not praise Allah and I did not beg mercy of Allah for him and she sneezed and she praised Allah and so I said: May Allah have mercy upon you, as I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When any one of you sneezes he should praise Allah and the other should say: May Allah have mercy upon you, and if he does not praise Allah, no mercy should be begged for him.
[7128]
Iyas b. Salama b. al-Akwa reported that his father reported to him that he heard Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: A person sneezed in his presence and he said to him: May Allah have mercy upon you. And he then sneezed for the second time and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to him: He is suffering from cold (and no response is necessary).
[7129]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The yawning as from the devil. So when one of you yawns he should try to restrain it as far as it lies in his power.
[7130]
The son of Abu Said al-Khudri reported on the authority of his father that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: When one of you yawns, he should keep his mouth shut with the help of his hand, for it is the devil that enters therein.
[7131]
The son of Abu Said al-Khudri reported on the authority of his father that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: When one of you yawns, he should try to restrain it with cue help of his hand since it is the Satan that enters therein.
[7132]
The son of Abu Said al-Khudri reported on the authority of his father that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said. When one of you yawns while engaged in prayer, he should try to restrain so far as it lies in his power, since it is the Satan that enter therein.
[7133]
Abu Said al-Khudri reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) a hadith like this through another chain of transmitters.
[7134]
'A'isha reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: The Angels were born out of light and the Jinns were born out of the spark of fire and Adam was born as he has been defined (in the Qur'an) for you (i.e. he is fashioned out of clay).
[7135]
Abu Huraira reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: A group of Bani Isra'il was lost. I do not know what happened to it, but I think (that it 'underwent a process of metamorphosis) and assumed the shape of rats. Don't you see when the milk of the camel is placed before them, these do not drink and when the milk of goat is placed before them, these do drink. Abu Huraira said: I narrated this very hadith to Ka'b and he said: Did you hear this from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)? I (Abu Huraira) said: Yes. He said this again and again, and I said: Have I read Torah? This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Ishaq with a slight variation of wording.
[7136]
Abu Huraira reported that the rat (is the result of) metamorphosis (of a group of Bani Isra'il) and the proof of this is that when the milk of goat is placed before it, it drinks it, and when the milk of the camel is placed before it, it would not taste it at all. Ka'b said: Did you hear it from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)? Thereupon he said: Has Torah been revealed to me?
[7137]
Abu Huraira reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: The believer does not allow to be stung twice from one (and the same) hole. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira through another chain of transmitters.
[7138]
Suhaib reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Strange are the ways of a believer for there is good in every affair of his and this is not the case with anyone else except in the case of a believer for if he has an occasion to feel delight, he thanks (God), thus there is a good for him in it, and if he gets into trouble and shows resignation (and endures it patiently), there is a good for him in it.
[7139]
'Abd al-Rahman b. Abu Bakra reported on the authority of his father that a person praised another person in the presence of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), whereupon he said: Woe be to thee, you have broken the neck of your friend, you have broken the neck of your friend-he said this twice. If one of you has to praise his friend at all, he should say: I think (him to be) so and Allah knows it well and I do not know the secret of the heart and Allah knows the destined end, and I cannot testify his purity against Allah but (he appears) to be so and so.
[7140]
Abd al-Rahman b. Abu Bakra reported on the authority of his father that a person was mentioned in the presence of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), and a person said: Allah's Messenger, no person is more excellent than he after Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). Thereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: Woe be to thee, you have broken the neck of your friend, and he said this twice. Then Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: If anyone has to praise his brother at all, he should say: I think him to be so and so, and even on this he should say: I do not consider anyone purer than Allah (considers). This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Shu'ba with a slight variation of wording.
[7141]
Abu Musa reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) saw a person lauding another person or praising him too much. Thereupon he said: You killed him, or you sliced the back of a person.
[7142]
Abu Ma'mar reported that a person lauded a ruler amongst the rulers and Miqdad began to throw dust upon him and he said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) commanded us that we should throw dust upon the faces of those who shower too much praise.
[7143]
Hammam b. al-Harith reported that a person began to praise 'Uthman and Miqdad sat upon his knee; and he was a bulky person and began to throw pebbles upon his (flatterer's) face. Thereupon 'Uthman said: What is the matter with you? And he said: Verily, Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: When you see those who shower (undue) praise (upon others), throw dust upon their faces.
[7144]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Miqdad through another chain of transmitters.
[7145]
'Abdullah b. Umar reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: It was shown in a vision that I was rinsing my mouth with miswak and two persons began to contend with one another for getting that miswak. One was older than the other. I gave the miswak to the younger one amongst them, but it was said to me: (Let it be given) to the older one. So I gave it to the older one.
[7146]
It was reported that Abu Huraira used to say: Listen to me, inmate of the apartment; listen to me, inmate of the apartment, while 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) had been busy in observing prayer. As she finished prayer, she said to "Urwa: Did you hear his words? And this is how Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) used to utter (so distinctly) that if one intended to count (the words uttered) he would be able to do so.
[7147]
Abu Sa'id Khudri reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Do not take down anything from me, and he who took down anything from me except the Qur'an, he should efface that and narrate from me, for there is no harm in it and he who attributed any falsehood to me-and Hammam said: I think he also said: "deliberately"-he should in fact find his abode in the Hell-Fire.
[7148]
Suhaib reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) thus said: There lived a king before you and he had a (court) magician.As he (the magician) grew old, he said to the king: I have grown old, send some young boy to me so that I should teach him magic.He (the king) sent to him a young man so that he should train him (in magic).And on his way (to the magician) he (the young man) found a monk sitting there.He (the young man) listened to his (the monk's) talk and was impressed by it.It became his habit that on his way to the magician he met the monk and set there and he came to the magician (late).He (the magician) beat him because of delay.He made a complaint of that to the monk and he said to him: When you feel afraid of the magician, say: Members of my family had detained me.And when you feel afraid of your family you should say: The magician had detained me.It so happened that there came a huge beast (of prey) and it blocked the way of the people, and he (the young boy) said: I will come to know today whether the magician is superior or the monk is superior.He picked up a stone and said: O Allah, if the affair of the monk is dearer to Thee than the affair of the magician, cause death to this animal so that the people should be able to move about freely.He threw that stone towards it and killed it and the people began to move about (on the path freely).He (the young man) then came to that monk and Informed him and the monk said: Sonny, today you are superior to me.Your affair has come to a stage where I find that you would be soon put to a trial, and in case you are put to a trial don't give my clue.That young man began to treat the blind and those suffering from leprosy and he in fact began to cure people from (all kinds) of illness.When a companion of the king who had gone blind heard about him, he came to him with numerous gifts and said: If you cure me all these things collected together here would be yours.Be said: I myself do not cure anyone.It is Allah Who cures and if you affirm faith in Allah, I shall also supplicate Allah to cure you.He affirmed his faith in Allah and Allah cured him and he came to the king and sat by his side as he used to sit before.The king said to him: Who restored your eyesight?He said: My Lord.Thereupon he said: It means that your Lord is One besides me.He said: My Lord and your Lord is Allah, so he (the king) took hold of him and tormented him till he gave a clue of that boy.The young man was thus summoned and the king said to him: O boy, it has been conveyed to me that you have become so much proficient in your magic that you cure the blind and those suffering from leprosy and you do such and such things.Thereupon he said: I do not cure anyone; it is Allah Who cures, and he (the king) took hold of him and began to torment him. So he gave a clue of the monk.The monk was thus summoned and it was said to him: You should turn back from your religion.He, however, refused to do so.He (ordered) for a saw to be brought (and when it was done) he (the king) placed it in the middle of his head and tore it into parts till a part fell down.Then the courtier of the king was brought and it was said to him: Turn back from your religion.Arid he refused to do so, and the saw was placed in the midst of his head and it was torn till a part fell down.Then that young boy was brought and it was said to him: Turn back from your religion.He refused to do so and he was handed over to a group of his courtiers.And he 'said to them: Take him to such and such mountain; make him climb up that mountain and when you reach its top (ask him to renounce his faith) but if he refuses to do so, then throw him (down the mountain).So they took him and made him climb up the mountain and he said: O Allah, save me from them (in any way) Thou likest and the mountain began to quake and they all fell down and that person came walking to the king. The king said to him: What has happened to your companions?He said: Allah has saved me from them.He again handed him to some of his courtiers and said: Take him and carry him in a small boat and when you reach the middle of the ocean (ask him to renounce) his religion, but if he does not renounce his religion throw him (into the water).So they took him and he said: O Allah, save me from them and what they want to do.It was quite soon that the boat turned over and they were drowned and he came walking to the king, and the king said to him: What has happened to your companions?He said: Allah has saved me from them, and he said to the king: You cannot kill me until you do what I ask you to do.And he said: What is that?He said: You should gather people in a plain and hang me by the trunk (of a tree).Then take hold of an arrow from the quiver and say: In the name of Allah, the Lord of the worlds; then shoot an arrow and if you do that then you would be able to kill me.So he (the king) called the people in an open plain and tied him (the boy) to the trunk of a tree, then he took hold of an arrow from his quiver and then placed the arrow in the bow and then said: In the name of Allah, the Lord of the young boy; he then shot an arrow and it bit his temple.He (the boy) placed his hands upon the temple where the arrow had bit him and he died and the people said: We affirm our faith in the Lord of this young man, we affirm our faith in the Lord of this young man, we affirm our faith in the Lord of this young man.The courtiers came to the king and it was said to him: Do you see that Allah has actually done what you aimed at averting.They (the people) have affirmed their faith in the Lord.He (the king) commanded ditches to be dug at important points in the path.When these ditches were dug, and the fire was lit in them it was said (to the people): He who would not turn back from his (boy's) religion would be thrown in the fire or it would be said to them to jump in that. (The people courted death but did not renounce religion) till a woman came with her child and she felt hesitant in jumping into the fire and the child said to her: 0 mother, endure (this ordeal) for it is the Truth.
[7149]
'Ubadab. Walid b. Samit reported: I and my father set out in search of knowledge to a tribe of the Ansar before their death (i.e. before the Companions of the Holy Prophet left the world) and I was the first to meet Abu Yasar, a Companion of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and there was a young man with him who carried the record of letters with him and there was a mantle prepared by the tribe of Ma'afiri upon him.And his servant too had a Ma'afiri mantle over him.My father said to him: My uncle, I see the signs of anger or that of agony on your face.He said: Yes, such and such person, the son of so and so, of the tribe of Harami owed me a debt. I went to his family, extended salutations and said: Where is he?They said: He is not here.Then came out to me his son who was at the threshold of his youth. I said to him: Where is your father?He said: No sooner did he hear your sound than he hid himself behind my mother's bedstead.I said to him: Walk out to me, for I know where you are.He came out.I said to him: What prompted you to hide yourself from me? He said: By God, whatever I would say to you would not be a lie.By Allah, I fear that I should tell a lie to you and in case of making promise with you I should break it, as you are the Companion of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). The fact is that I was hard up in regard to money.I said: Do you adjure by Allah? He said: I adjure by Allah.I said: Do you adjure by Allah?He said: I adjure by Allah.I said: Do you adjure by Allah?He said: I adjure by Allah.Then he brought his promissory note and he wrote off (the debt) with his hand and said: Make payment when you find yourself solvent enough to pay me back; if you are not, then there is no liability upon you.These two eyes of mine saw, and he (Abu'I-Yasar) placed his fingers upon his eyes and these two ears of mine heard and my heart retained, and he pointed towards his heart that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: He who gives time to one who is financially hard up (in the payment of debt) or writes off his debt, Allah will provide him His shadow.I said to him: My uncle, if you get the cloak of your servant and you give him your two clothes, or take his two clothes of Ma'afir and give him your cloak, then there would be one dress for you and one for him.He wiped my head and said: O Allah, bless the son of my brother. O, son of my brother, these two very eyes of mine saw and these two ears of mine listened to and this heart of mine retained this, and he pointed towards the heart that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Feed them (the servants) and clothe them (the servants) what you wear, and if I give him the goods of the world, it is easy for me than this that he should take my virtues on the Day of Resurrection.We went on till we came to Jabir b. Abdullah in the mosque and he was busy in observing prayer in one cloth which he had joined at its opposite ends.I made my way through the people till I sat between him and the Qibla and I said: May Allah have mercy upon you.Do you observe prayer with one cloth on your body whereas your mantle is lying at your side?He pointed me with his hand towards my breast just like this and he separated his fingers and bent them in the shape of a bow.And (he said): I thought that a fool like you should come to me so that he should see me as I do and he should then also do like it. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came to us in this very mosque and he had in his hand the twig of the palm-tree and he saw mucus towards the Qibla of the mosque and he erased it with the help of the twig.He then came to us and said: Who amongst you likes that Allah should turn His face away from him?We were afraid.He then again said: Who amongst you likes that Allah should turn His face away from him?We were afraid.He again said: Who amongst you likes that Allah should turn His face away from him?We said: Allah's Messenger, none of us likes it. And he said: If one amongst you stands for prayer, Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, is before him he should not spit in front of him, or on his right side, but should spit on his left side beneath his left foot and if he is impelled to do so all of a sudden (in spite of himself) he should then spit in his cloth and fold it in some part of it. (and he further said:) Bring some sweet-smelling thing.A young man who belonged to our tribe stood up, went and brought scent in his palm.Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) took that and applied it to the end of that twig and then touched the place where there had been mucus. Jabir said: This is why you should apply scent to your mosques.
It is reported on the same authority: We set out along with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) on an expedition of Batn Buwat. He (the Holy Prophet) was in search of al-Majdi b. 'Amr al-Juhani. (We had so meagre equipment) that five. six or seven of us had one camel to ride and so we mounted it turn by turn.Once there wan. the turn of an Ansari to ride upon the camel.He made it kneel down to ride over it (and after having. mounted it), he tried to raise it up but it hesitated. So he said.May there be curse of Allah upon you ! Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Who is there to curse his camel?He said: Allah's Messenger, it' is I. Thereupon he said: Get down from the camel and let us not have in our company the cursed one.Don't curse your own selves, nor your children. nor your belongings.There is the possibility that your curse may synchronies with the time when Allah is about to confer upon you what you demand and thus your prayer may be readily responded.
It is reported on the same authority: We set out on an expedition along with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) until it was evening, and we had been near a. water reservoir of Arabia.Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Who would be the person who would go ahead and set right the reservoir and drink water himself and serve us with it? Jabir said: I stood up and said: Allah's Messenger, it is I who am ready to do that.Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Who is the person to accompany Jabir?And then Jabbar b. Sakhr stood up.So we went to that well and poured in that tank a bucket or two of water and plastered it with clay and then began to fill it (with water) until it was filled to the brim. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was the first who appeared before us, and he said: Do you (both) permit me to drink water out of it?We said: Yea, Allah's Messenger.He led his camel to drink water and it drank.He then pulled its rein and it stretched its legs and began to urinate.He then took it aside and made it kneel down at another place and then came to the tank and performed ablution.I then got up and performed ablution like the ablution of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), and Jabbar b. Sakhr went in order to relieve himself and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) got up to observe prayer and there was a mantle over me. I tried to invert its ends but it was too short (to cover my body easily).It had its borders. I then inverted it (the mantle) and drew its opposite ends and then tied them at my neck.I then came and stood upon the left side of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).He caught hold of me and made me go round behind him, until he made me stand on his right side.Then Jabbar b. Sakhr came.He performed ablution and then came and stood on the left side of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).Then Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) caught hold of our hands together, pushed us back and made us stand behind him.Then Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) began to look upon me with darting looks, but I did not perceive that.After that I became aware of it and he pointed with the gesture of his hand that I should wrap my loin-cloth.When Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had finished the prayer, he said: Jabir! I said:Allah's Messenger, at thy beck and call.He said: When the cloth around you is inadequate, then tie the opposite ends but when it is small, tie it over the lower body.
Jabir reported: We set out on an expedition with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and the only means of sustenance for every person amongst us was only one date for a day and we used to chew it.And we struck the leaves with the help of our bow and ate them until the sides of our mouths were injured.It so happened one day that a person was overlooked and not given a date.We carried that person and bore witness to the fact that he had not been given that date so he was offered that and he got up and received that.
Jabir reported: We set out on an expedition along with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) until we got down at a spacious valley and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) went to relieve himself.I followed him with a bucket full of water and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) looked about and he found no privacy but two trees at the end of the valley and Allah's Messenger (may. peace be upon him) went to one of them and took hold of one of its twigs and said: Be thou under my control by the permission of Allah, and so it came under his control like the camel who has its nosestring in the hand of its rider, and then he came to the second tree and took hold of a twig and said: Be thou under my control with the permission of Allah, and it came under his control, and when he came in the middle of the two trees he joined together the two twigs and said : join with the permission of Allah. Jabir said: I was afraid lest Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) should be aware of my nearness and go still farther.And Muhammad b. Abbad has used the word " faitab'd" and I began to talk to myself.And as I saw, I suddenly found Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) before me and the two trees were separated and each one of them was standing at its place. I saw Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) standing for a short time, nodding his head towards right and left.Isma'il pointed towards the right and left with the help of his head (in order to demonstrate how the Holy Prophet had pointed).Then he (the Holy Prophet) came to me and said: Jabir did you see my place where I was standing?I said: Allah's Messenger, yes.He then said: Then you should go to those two trees and cut a twig from each of them and go to that place with them where I was standing and stand there where I was standing and place a twig on the right and a twig on the left. Jabir said: I set out and took hold of a stone and broke it and sharpened it and then I came to those trees and cut a twig from 'each one of them. I then came dragging them until I stood at the place where Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had been standing and placed a twig on the right and a twig on the left.Then I met him and said: Allah's Messenger, I have done that, but (kindly) explain to me the reason for it.Thereupon he said: I passed by two graves the occupants of which had been undergoing torment. I liked to make intercession for them so that the might be relieved of this torment y as long as these twigs remain fresh. Jabir said: We came back to the (camp of the) army and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Jabir, call people for per- forming wudu. I cried: Come and perform wudu, come and perform wudu, come and perform wudu.I said: Allah's Messenger, there is not even a drop of water in the army camp, and there. was a person who used to cool the water for Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in the old water-skin which kept hanging by the twig.He asked me to go to such and such Ansari and ask him to see if there was any water in that skin.I went to him and cast a glance in it but did not find anything but a drop in the mouth of that water-skin and if I were to draw that, the water-skin's,. dried part would suck it up.I came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: Allah's Messenger, I have not found anything in it but a drop of water in the mouth of the water-skin and now if I were to draw that, it would be absorbed.He said: Go and bring that to me.I brought that to him.He took hold of it -and began to utter something which I could not understand and then pressed it with his hand and gave that to me and said: Jabir, announce for the tub to be brought.So I announced that the tub of the army (be brought).It was brought accordingly and I placed it before him (the Holy Prophet).Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) placed his hands in the tub like this: with his fingers stretched out, and then he placed his fingers at the bottom of the tub and said: Jabir, take it (that waters-skin) and pour water over me, by reciting Bismillah, and I poured water and I said: Bismillah, and found water sprouting out between the fingers of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).Then that tub gushed forth until it was filled up and the Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Jabir, make an announcement to the effect: He who needs water should take that. Jabir said: The people came and got water until they were all satiated.I said: Is there anyone left who wants to get it?And Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) then lifted up his hand from that tub and it was still full. Then the people made a complaint to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) about hunger and he said: May Allah provide you food ! We came to the bank of the ocean and the ocean was tossing and it threw out a big animal and we lit fire and cooked it and took it until we had eaten to our heart's content. Jabir said: I and such and such five persons entered Its socket and nobody could see us until we had come out, and we took hold of one of its ribs and twisted it into a sort of arch, then we called the tallest of the persons of the army and the hugest of the camels of the army and it had the big saddle over it, and it could easily pass through it without the rider having need to bend down.
[7150]
Al-Bara' b. 'Azib reported that Abu Bakr Siddlq came to the residence of my father ('Azib) and bought a haudaj from him and said to 'Azib: Send your son to my residence (to carry this haudaj), and my father said to me: Carry it (for him).So I carried it and there went along with him (with Abu Bakr) my father in order to fetch its price and he ('Azib) said to Abu Bakr: Abu Bakr, narrate to me what you both did on the night when you set out on a journey along with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).He said: We set out during the night and went on walking until it was noon, and the path was vacant and so none passed by that (until) there appeared prominently before us a large rock.It had its shade and the rays of the sun did not reach that place.So we got down at that place.I then went to the rock and levelled the ground with my hands at the place where the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) would take rest under its shade.I then set the bedding and said: Allah's Messenger, go to sleep and I shall keep a watch around you.I went out and watched around him.There we saw a shepherd moving towards that rock with his flock and he intended what we intended (i.e. taking rest).I met him and said to him: Young boy, to which place do you belong?He said: I am a person from Medina.I said, is there any milk in the udders of your sheep and goats?He said: Yes.He took hold of a goat, and I said to him: Clean the udder well so that it should be free from hair, dust and impurity.I saw al-Bara' striking his hand upon the other (to give an indication) how he did that.He milked the goat for me in a wooden cup which he had with him and I had with me a bucket in which I kept water for drinking and for performing ablution.I came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and did not like to awaken him from sleep but he was accidentally startled from the sleep.I poured water upon the milk (till It was cold) and I said: Allah's Messenger, take this milk.He then took It and I was delighted and he (the Holy Prophet) said: Is now not the time to march on?I said: Of course.So he marched on after the sun had passed the meridian and Suraqa b. Malik pursued us and we had been walking on soft, level ground.I said: Allah's Messenger, we are about to be overtaken by them.Thereupon he said: Be not grieved.Verily, Allah is with us.Then Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) cursed him and his horse sank into the earth.I think he also said: I know you have hurled curse upon me. So supplicate Allah for me and I take an oath that I shall turn everyone away who would come in search of you.So he (Allah's Messenger) supplicated Allah and he was rescued and he came back and to everyone he met, he said: I have combed all this side.In short, he diverted everyone whom he met and he in fact fulfilled his promise.
Al-Bara' reported: Abu Bakr purchased a saddle from me for thirteen dirhams; the rest of the hadith is the same, and in the narration of Uthman b. 'Umar, the words are: He (Suraqa b. Malik) drew near Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), and he (the Holy Prophet) cursed him and his camel sank in the earth up to the belly and he jumped from that and said: Muhammad, I am fully aware of It that it is your doing.Supplicate Allah that He should rescue me from it in which I am (pitchforked) and I give you a solemn pledge that I shall keep this as a secret from all those who are coming after me.Take hold of an arrow out of it (quiver) for you will find my camels and my slaves at such and such place and you can get whatever you need (on showing this arrow).He (the Holy Prophet) said: I don't need your camels.And we (the Holy Prophet and Abu Bakr) came to Medina during the night and the people began to contend as to where Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) should reside and he encamped in the tribe of Najjar who were related to 'Abd ul-Muttalib from the side of mother.Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) honoured them, then people climbed upon house-top and women also and boys scattered in the way, and they were all crying: Muhammad, Messenger of Allah, Muhammad,Messenger of Allah.
[7151]
Hammim b. Munabbih reported: This is what Abu Huraira reported to us from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and in this connection he narrated some of the ahadith and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: It was said to people of Israel: Enter this land saying Hitta (Remove Thou from us the burden of our sins), whereupon We would forgive you your sins, but they twisted (this statement) and entered the gate dragging upon their breech and said: The "grain in the ear."
[7152]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, sent revelation to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) just before his death in quick succession until he left for his heavenly home, and the day when he died, he received the revelation profusely.
[7153]
Tariq b. Shihab reported that a Jew said to'Umar: You recite a verse which, if it had been revealed in relation to us, we would have taken that day as the day of rejoicing. Thereupon 'Umar said: I know where it was revealed and on the day when it was revealed and where Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had been at that time when it was revealed. It was revealed on the day of 'Arafa (ninth of Dhu'l Hijjah) and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had been staying in 'Arafat. Sufyan said: I doubt, whether it was Friday or not (and the verse referred to) is this: "Today I have perfected your religion for you and completed My favours upon you "(v. 4).
[7154]
Tariq b. Shihab reported that a Jew said to 'Umar: If this verse were revealed in relation to the Jews (i.e. "This day I have perfected your religion for you and have completed My favours for you and have chosen for you al-Islam as religion") we would have taken the day of rejoicing on which this verse was revealed. Thereupon 'Umar said: I know the day on which it was revealed and the hour when it was revealed and where Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had been when it was revealed. It was revealed on the night of Friday and we were in 'Arafat with Alleh's Messenger (may peace be upon him) at that time.
[7155]
Tariq b. Shihab reported that a Jew came to 'Umar and said: Commander of the Faithful, there is a verse in your Book, which you recite. Had it been revealed in connection with the Jews, we would have taken it as the day of rejoicing. Thereupon he said: Which verse do you mean? He replied: "This day I have perfected your religion for you and I have completed My favours upon you and I have chosen al-Islam as religion for you." Umar said, I know the day when it was revealed and the place where it was revealed. It was revealed to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) at 'Arafat on Friday.
[7156]
'Urwa b. Zubair reported that he asked 'A'isha about the words of Allah: "If you fear that you will not be able to maintain equity amongst the orphan girls, then marry (those) you like from amongst the women two, three or four." She said: O, the son of my sister, the orphan girl is one who is under the patronage of her guardian and she shares with him in his property and her property and beauty fascinate him and her guardian makes up his mind to marry her without giving her due share of the wedding money and is not prepared (to pay so much amount) which anyone else is prepared to pay and so Allah has forbidden to marry these girls but in case when equity is observed as regards the wedding money and they are prepared to pay them the full amount of the wedding money and Allah commanded to marry other women besides them according to the liking of their heart. 'Urwa reported that 'A'isha said that people began to seek verdict from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) after the revelation of this verse about them (orphan girls) and Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, revealed this verse: "They asked thee verdict about women; say: Allah gives verdict to you in regard to them and what is recited to you in the Book about orphan woman, whom you give not what is ordained for them while you like to marry them" (iv. 126). She said: The wording of Allah "what is recited to you" in the Book means the first verse, i.e. "if you fear that you may not be able to observe equity in case of an orphan woman, marry what you like in case of woman" (iv. 3). 'A'isha said: (And as for this verse [iv. 126], i.e. and you intend "to marry one of them from amongst the orphan girls" it pertains to one who is in charge (of orphans) having small amount of wealth and less beauty and they have been forbidden that they should marry what they like of her wealth and beauty out of the orphan girls, but with equity, because of their disliking for them.
[7157]
'Urwa reported that he asked 'A'isha about the words of Allah: "If you fear that you will not be able to observe equity in case of orphan girls"; the rest of the hadith is the same but with a slight variation of wording.
[7158]
'A'isha said that as for the words of Allah: "If you fear that you would not be able to observe equity in case of orphan girls)," it was revealed in reference to a person who had an orphan girl (as his ward) and he was her guardian, and her heir, and she possessed property, but there was none to contend on her behalf except her ownself. And he (her guardian) did not give her in marriage because of her property and he tortured her and ill-treated her, it was in relation to her that (Allah said:) "If you fear that you would not be able to observe equity in case of orphan girls, then marry whom you like among women," i.e. whatever I have made lawful for you and leave her whom you are putting to torture.
[7159]
'A'isha said in connection with His words (those of Allah): "What is recited to you in the Book about orphan women whom you give not what is ordained for them, while you like to marry them," these were revealed in connection with an orphan girl who was in the charge of the person and she shared with him in his property and he was reluctant to marry her himself and was also unwilling to marry her to someone else (fearing) that (that person) would share in his property (as the husband of that girl), preventing her to marry, neither marrying her himself nor marrying her to another person.
[7160]
Hisham reported that 'A'isha said in connection with the words of Allah: "They ask thee the religious verdict about women, say: Allah gives you the verdict about them" (iv. 126), that these relate to an orphan girl who is in charge of the person and she shares with him in his property (as a heir) even in the date-palm trees and he is reluctant to give her hand in marriage to any other person lest he (her husband) should partake of his property, and thus keep her in a lingering state.
[7161]
Hisham reported on the authority of his father that 'A'isha said in connection with His (Allah's) words: "And whoever is poor let him take reasonably (out of it)" that it was revealed in connection with the custodian of the property of an orphan, who is in charge of her and looks after her; In case he is poor, he is allowed to eat out of that.
[7162]
'A'isha reported in connection with the words of Allah, the Exalted: "He who is rich should abstain, and he who is poor may reasonably eat (out of it)" that this was revealed in relation to the guardian of an orphan who is poor; he may get out of that what is reasonable keeping in view his own status of solvency.
[7163]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Hisham with the same chain of transmitters.
[7164]
'A'isha reported that these words of Allah: "When they came upon you from above you and from below you and when the eyes turned dull and the hearts rose up to the throats" (xxxiii. 10) pertain to the day of Ditch.
[7165]
'A'isha said in connection with the verse: "And if a woman has reason to fear ill-treatment from her husband or that he might turn away from her" (iv. 128) that it was revealed in case of a woman who had long association with a person (as his wife) and now he intends to divorce her and she says: Do not divorce me, but retain me (as wife in your house) and you are permitted to live with another wife. It is in this context that this verse was revealed.
[7166]
'A'isha said in connection with these words of Allah, the Exalted and Glorious: "And if a woman has reason to fear ill-treatment from her husband or that he might turn away from her" that it was revealed in case of a woman who lived with a person and perhaps he does not want to prolong (his relationship with her) whereas she has had sexual relationship with him (and as a result thereof) she got a child from him and she does not like that she should be divorced, so she says to him: I permit you to live with the other wife.
[7167]
'Urwa reported on the authority of his father that 'A'isha said to him: O, the son of my sister, the Muslims were commanded to seek forgiveness for the Companions of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) but they reviled him.
[7168]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Abu Usama with the same chain of narrators.
[7169]
Sa'id b. Jubair reported: The inhabitants of Kufa differed in regard to this verse: "But whoever slays another believer intentionally, his requital shall be Hell" (iv. 92), so I went to Ibn 'Abbas and asked him about it, whereupon he said: This has been revealed and nothing abrogated it.
[7170]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Shu'ba with the same chain of narrators but with a slight variation of wording.
[7171]
Sa'id b. Jubair reported: 'Abd al Rahman b. Abzi commanded me that I should ask Ibn 'Abbas about these two verses: "He who slays a believer intentionally his requital shall be Hell where he would abide for ever" (iv. 92). So, I asked him and he said: Nothing has abrogated it. And as for this verse: "And they who call not upon another god with Allah and slay not the soul which Allah has forbidden ,except in the cause of justice" (xxv. 68), he (Ibn Abbas) said: This has been revealed in regard to the polytheists."
[7172]
Ibn 'Abbas said: This verse was revealed in Mecca : "And they who call not upon another god with Allah and slay not the soul which Allah has forbidden except in the cause of justice" up to the word Muhdana (abased). Thereupon the polytheists said: Islam is of no avail to us for we have made peer with Allah and we killed the soul which Allah had forbidden to do and we committed debauchery, and it was (on this occasion) that Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, revealed this verse: "Except him who repents and believes and does good deeds" up to the end Ibn 'Abbis says: He who enters the fold of Islam and understands its command and then kills the soul there is no repentance for him.
[7173]
Sa'id b. Jubair reported: I said to Ibn Abbas: Will the repentance of that person be accepted who kills a believer intentionally ? He said: No. I recited to him this verse of Sura al-Furqan (xix.): "And those who call not upon another god with Allah and slay not the soul which Allah has forbidden except in the cause of justice" to the end of the verse. He said: This is a Meccan verse which has been abrogated by a verse revealed at Medina: "He who slays a believer intentionally, for him is the requital of Hell-Fire where he would abide for ever," and in the narration of Ibn Hisham (the words are) : I recited to him this verse of Sura al-Furqan: "Except one who made repentance."
[7174]
Ubaidullah b. 'Abdullah b. 'Utba reported: Ibn Abbas said to me: Do you know-and in the words of Harun (another narrator): Are you aware of-the last Sura which was revealed in the Qur'an as a whole? I said: Yes, "When came the help from Allah and the victory" (cx.). Thereupon, he said: You have told the truth. And in the narration of Abu Shaiba (the words are): Do you know the Sura ? And he did not mention the words "the last one".
[7175]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Abu 'Umais through the same chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording.
[7176]
Ibn Abbas reported that some Muslims met a person with a small flock of sheep. He said: As-Salam-o-'Alaikum. They caught hold of him and killed him and took possession of his flock. Then this verse was revealed: "He who meets you and extends you salutations, don't say: You are not a Muslim" (iv. 94). Ibn 'Abbas, however, recited the word as-Salam instead of "as-Salam".
[7177]
Bara' reported: When the Ansar performed the Pilgrimage, they did not enter their houses but from behind. A person from the Ansar came and he began to enter from his door but it was said to him (why he was doing something in contravention to the common practice of coming to the houses from behind). Then this verse was revealed. "Piety is not that you come to the doors from behind" (ii. 189).
[7178]
Ibn Mas'ud said: Since our acceptance of Islam and the revelation of this verse in which Allah has shown annoyance to us: "Has not the time yet come for the believers that their hearts should be humble for the remembrance of Allah ?" (lvii. 16), there was a gap of four years.
[7179]
Ibn Abbas reported: During the pre-Islamic days women circumambulated the Ka'ba nakedly, and said: Who would provide cloth to cover the one who is circumambulating the Ka'ba so that she would cover her private parts? And then she would say: Today will be exposed the whole or the part and what is exposed I shall not make it lawful. It was in this connection that the verse was revealed: "Adorn yourself at every place of worship" (vii. 31).
[7180]
Jabir reported that 'Abdullah b. Ubayy b. Salul used to say to his slave-girl: Go and fetch something for us by committing prostitution. It was in this connection that Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, revealed this verse: "And compel not your slave-girls to prostitution when they desire to keep chaste in order to seek the frail goods of this world's life, and whoever compels them, then surely after their compulsion Allah is Forgiving, Merciful" (xxiv. 33).
[7181]
Jabir reported that 'Abdullah b. Ubayy b. Salul had two slave-girls; one was called Musaika and the other one was called Umaima and he compelled them to prostitution (for which'Abdullah b. Ubayy b. Salul compelled them). They made a complaint about this to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and it was upon this that this verse was revealed: "And compel not your slave-girls to prostitute" up to the words: "Allah is Forgiving, Merciful."
[7182]
Abdullah b. Mas'ud reported in connection with the words of Allah, the Exalted and Glorious: "Those to whom they call upon, themselves seek the means or access to their Lord as to whoever of them becomes nearest" (xvii. 57) that it related to a party of Jinn who were being worshipped and they embraced Islam but those who worshipped them kept on worshipping them (though the Jinn whom the misguided people worshipped had become Muslims). It was then that this verse was revealed.
[7183]
Abdullah b. Mas'ud reported in connection with the verse: "Those whom they call upon, themselves seek the means of access to their Lord," that it related to a group of people who worshipped a party amongst the Jinn. The group from amongst the Jinn embraced Islam, but the people kept worshipping them as they did before, and it was (on this occasion) that the verse was revealed: "Those whom they call upon, themselves seek the means of access to their Lord." This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Sulaimin with the same chain of transmitters.
[7184]
Abdullah b. Mas'ud said in connection with the verse: "Those whom they call upon, themselves seek the means of access to their Lord," that that verse was revealed in connection with a party of Arabs who used to worship a group amnogst the jinn; the jinn embraced Islam but the people kept worshipping them without being conscious of it. Then this verse was revealed: "Those whom they call upon, themselves seek the means of access to their Lord."
[7185]
Sa'id b. Jubair reported: I said to Ibn 'Abbas about Sura Tauba, whereupon he said: As for Sura Tauba, it is meant to humiliate (the non-believers and the hypocrites). There is constantly revealed in it (the pronoun) minhum (of them) and minhom (of them, i.e. such is the condition of some of them) till they (the Muslims) thought that none would be left unmentioned out of them who would not be blamed (for one fault or the other). I again said: What about Sura Anfal? He said: It pertains to the Battle of Badr. I again asked him about Sura al-Hashr. He said: It was revealed in connection with (the tribe) of Banu Nadir.
[7186]
Ibn 'Umar reported that Umar delivered a sermon on the pulpit of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and he praised Allah and lauded Him and then said: Now coming to the point. Behold I when the command pertaining to the prohibition of wine was revealed, it was prepared from five things: from wheat, barley, date, grape, honey; and wine is that which clouds the intellect; and O people, I wish Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) could have explained to us in (more) detail the laws pertaining to the inheritance of the grandfather, about one who dies leaving no issue, and some of the problems pertaining to interest.
[7187]
Ibn 'Umar reported: I heard 'Umar b. Khattab delivering sermon on the pulpit ol Allah's messenger (may peace be upon him) and saying': Now, coming to the point, O people, there was revealed (the command pertaining to the prohibition of wine) and it was prepared (at that time) out of five things: grape, date, honey, wheat, barley, and wine is that which clouds the intellect, and, O people, I wish Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had explained to us in greater detail three things: the inheritance of the grandfather, of one who dies without leaving any issue, and some of the problems of interest.
[7188]
This hadith has been transmitted on the same authority but with a slight variation of wording.
[7189]
Abu Dharr took an oath that this verse: "These two adversaries who dispute about their Lord" (xxii. 19) was revealed in connection with those who on the Day of Badr came out (of rows to fight against the non-believers and they were) Hamza, 'Ali, 'Ubaida b. Harith (from the side of the Muslims) and 'Utba and Shaiba, both of them the sons of Rabi'a and Walid b. 'Utba (from the side of the non-believers of Mecca).
[7190]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Dharr through another chain of transmitters.